Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 9. Conversions and Mergers.

§ 50-73.124.
Definitions.

In this article:

“General partner”
means a partner in a partnership and a general partner in a limited partnership.

“Limited partner”
means a limited partner in a limited partnership.

“Limited partnership”
means a limited partnership created under the Virginia Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction.

“Partner”
includes both a general partner and a limited partner.

History.

1996, c. 292.

Law Review.

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

§ 50-73.125.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 631, cl. 4.

§ 50-73.126.
Conversion of limited partnership to partnership.

A limited partnership may be converted to a partnership pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding a provision to the contrary in a limited partnership agreement, the terms and conditions of a conversion of a limited partnership to a partnership shall be approved by all of the partners.

After the conversion is approved by the partners, the limited partnership shall cancel its certificate of limited partnership.

The conversion takes effect when the certificate of limited partnership is canceled.

A limited partner who becomes a general partner as a result of the conversion remains liable only as a limited partner for an obligation incurred by the limited partnership before the conversion takes effect. Subject to §

50-73.96

, the partner is liable as a general partner for an obligation of the partnership incurred after the conversion takes effect.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.127.
Effect of conversion; entity unchanged.

A limited partnership that has been converted pursuant to this article is for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

When a conversion takes effect:

All property owned by the converting limited partnership remains vested in the resulting partnership;

All obligations of the converting limited partnership continue as obligations of the resulting partnership; and

An action or proceeding pending against the converting limited partnership may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2007, c. 631.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 deleted “partnership or” preceding “limited partnership” throughout; and in subdivision B 1, substituted “resulting partnership” for “converted entity” twice.

§ 50-73.128.
Merger of partnerships.

Pursuant to a written plan of merger approved as provided in subsection C, a partnership may be merged with one or more domestic or foreign partnerships, limited partnerships, limited liability companies, business trusts, or corporations if:

The merger is not prohibited by the partnership agreement of any domestic partnership that is a party to the merger, and each domestic partnership party to the merger approves the plan of merger in accordance with subsection C and complies with the terms of its partnership agreement;

Each domestic limited partnership that is a party to the merger complies with the applicable provisions of Article 7.1 (§

50-73.48:1

et seq.) of Chapter 2.1 of this title;

Each domestic limited liability company that is a party to the merger complies with the applicable provisions of Article 13 (§

13.1-1069.1

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 13.1;

Each domestic business trust that is a party to the merger complies with the applicable provisions of Article 11 (§

13.1-1257

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 13.1;

Each domestic corporation that is a party to the merger complies with the applicable provisions of Article 12 (§

13.1-715.1

et seq.) of Chapter 9 or Article 11 (§

13.1-893.1

et seq.) of Chapter 10 of Title 13.1; and

The merger is permitted by the laws under which each foreign limited liability company, foreign partnership, foreign limited partnership, foreign business trust, and foreign corporation party to the merger is organized, formed or incorporated, and each such foreign limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, business trust, or corporation complies with those laws in effecting the merger.

The plan of merger shall set forth:

The name of each partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, business trust, or corporation that is a party to the merger;

The name of the surviving entity into which the other partnerships, limited partnerships, limited liability companies, business trusts, or corporations will merge;

Whether the surviving entity is a partnership, a limited partnership, a limited liability company, a business trust, or a corporation and the status of each partner;

The terms and conditions of the merger;

The manner and basis of converting the interests of each party to the merger into interests or obligations of the surviving entity, or into money or other property in whole or part; and

The street address of the surviving entity’s principal office.

The plan of merger shall be approved:

In the case of a partnership that is a party to the merger, by all of the partners, or a number or percentage specified for merger in the partnership agreement; and

In the case of a limited partnership that is a party to the merger, by the vote required for approval of a merger by the law of the state or foreign jurisdiction in which the limited partnership is organized and, in the absence of such a specifically applicable law, by all of the partners, notwithstanding a provision to the contrary in the partnership agreement.

After a plan of merger is approved and before the merger takes effect, the plan may be amended or abandoned as provided in the plan.

The merger takes effect on the later of:

The approval of the plan of merger by all parties to the merger, as provided in subsection C;

The filing of all documents required by law to be filed as a condition to the effectiveness of the merger; or

Any later effective date stated pursuant to subsection J of §

50-73.83

in a statement of merger filed pursuant to §

50-73.131

or, if no statement of merger is filed, any effective date specified in the plan of merger.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2000, c. 58; 2003, c. 340; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 631; 2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 340, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that amend and reenact §§

8.9A-406

,

8.9A-408

,

13.1-1001.1

,

13.1-1003

,

13.1-1012

,

50-73.2

,

50-73.84

, and

50-73.144

of the Code of Virginia and that amend the Code of Virginia by adding sections numbered 13.1-1010.4 and

13.1-1023.1

shall become effective on July 1, 2003, and that all other provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2003.”

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Article 11 (§

13.1-893.1

et seq.)” was substituted for “Article 11 (§

13.1-894

et seq.)” in subdivision A 5.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 58 substituted “§

50-73.83

” for “§

50-73.85

” in subdivision D 3.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 340, effective October 1, 2003, inserted “business trusts” throughout the section; inserted present subdivision A 4; redesignated former subdivisions A 4 and A 5 as present subdivisions A 5 and A 6; and in subdivision A 6, inserted “foreign business trust.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “of this section” following “subsection C” in subdivsion A 1 and substituted “(§

13.1-715.1

et seq.)” for “(§

13.1-716

et seq.)” in subdivision A 5.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 substituted “this title” for “Title 50” in subdivision A 2; and substituted “principal office” for “chief executive” in subdivision B 6.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 288 substituted “13.1-1069.1” for “13.1-1070” in subdivision A 3.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

De facto merger. —

Limited partnership can merge into a limited liability company only in accordance with §

50-73.128

, as there can be no de facto merger of a partnership into a limited liability company when there has been no compliance with the requirements of §

50-73.128

. Accordingly, plaintiff, though wrongfully ousted from a limited partnership, had not shown that he was entitled to have his partnership interest purchased as a “dissociated partner” under §

50-73.129

or

50-73.112

.Greenfeld v. Stitely, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 7 (Fairfax County Jan. 5, 2007).

§ 50-73.129.
Effect of merger.

When a merger takes effect:

The separate existence of every partnership or limited partnership that is a party to the merger, other than the surviving entity, ceases;

All property owned by each of the merged partnerships or limited partnerships vests in the surviving entity;

All obligations of every partnership or limited partnership that is a party to the merger become the obligations of the surviving entity; and

An action or proceeding pending against a partnership or limited partnership that is a party to the merger may be continued as if the merger had not occurred, or the surviving entity may be substituted as a party to the action or proceeding.

The clerk of the Commission is the agent for service of process in an action or proceeding against a surviving foreign partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company or corporation to enforce an obligation of a domestic partnership or limited partnership that is a party to a merger. The surviving entity shall promptly file with the Commission the mailing address of its principal office and of any change of address. Service on the surviving foreign partnership or limited partnership shall be made on the clerk of the Commission in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Subject to §

50-73.96

, a partner of the surviving partnership or limited partnership is liable for:

All obligations of a party to the merger for which the partner was personally liable before the merger;

All other obligations of the surviving entity incurred before the merger by a party to the merger, but those obligations may be satisfied only out of property of the entity; and

All obligations of the surviving entity incurred after the merger takes effect, but those obligations may be satisfied only out of property of the entity if the partner is a limited partner.

If the obligations incurred before the merger by a party to the merger are not satisfied out of the property of the surviving partnership or limited partnership, the general partners of that party immediately before the effective date of the merger shall contribute the amount necessary to satisfy that party’s obligations to the surviving entity, as provided in §

50-73.123

or in the limited partnership act of the jurisdiction in which the party was formed, as the case may be, as if the merged party were dissolved.

A partner of a party to a merger who does not become a partner of the surviving partnership or limited partnership is dissociated from the entity, of which that partner was a partner, as of the date the merger takes effect. The surviving entity shall cause the partner’s interest in the entity to be purchased under §

50-73.112

or another statute specifically applicable to that partner’s interest with respect to a merger. The surviving entity is bound under §

50-73.113

by an act of a general partner dissociated under this subsection, and the partner is liable under §

50-73.114

for transactions entered into by the surviving entity after the merger takes effect.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2007, c. 631.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 substituted “principal office” for “chief executive” in the second sentence in subsection B.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Dissociated partner. —

Limited partnership can merge into a limited liability company only in accordance with §

50-73.128

, as there can be no de facto merger of a partnership into a limited liability company when there has been no compliance with the requirements of §

50-73.128

. Accordingly, plaintiff, though wrongfully ousted from a limited partnership, had not shown that he was entitled to have his partnership interest purchased as a “dissociated partner” under §

50-73.129

or

50-73.112

.Greenfeld v. Stitely, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 7 (Fairfax County Jan. 5, 2007).

§ 50-73.130.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 771, cl. 2.

§ 50-73.131.
Statement of merger.

After a plan of merger is approved, the surviving partnership or limited partnership shall file with the Commission a statement of merger on behalf of the partnerships that have filed either a statement of partnership authority or a statement of registration as a registered limited liability partnership that is not canceled.

A statement of merger executed by each party to the merger shall contain:

The name of each partnership or limited partnership that is a party to the merger;

The name of the surviving entity into which the other partnerships or limited partnership were merged;

The identification number issued by the Commission to each partnership that has filed a statement of partnership authority that has not been canceled;

The street address of the surviving entity’s principal office and of an office in this Commonwealth, if any; and

Whether the surviving entity is a partnership or a limited partnership.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection D, for the purposes of §

50-73.92

, property of the surviving partnership or limited partnership which before the merger was held in the name of another party to the merger is property held in the name of the surviving entity upon filing a statement of merger.

For the purposes of §

50-73.92

, real property of the surviving partnership or limited partnership which before the merger was held in the name of another party to the merger is property held in the name of the surviving entity upon recording a certified copy of the statement of merger in the office for recording transfers of that real property.

A filed and, if appropriate, recorded statement of merger, executed and declared to be accurate pursuant to subsection C of §

50-73.83

, stating the name of a partnership or limited partnership that is a party to the merger in whose name property was held before the merger and the name of the surviving entity, but not containing all of the other information required by subsection B, operates with respect to the partnerships or limited partnerships named to the extent provided in subsections C and D.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2000, c. 58; 2003, c. 567; 2007, c. 631; 2013, c. 18.

Cross references.

As to merger of foreign corporation, see §

13.1-766.1

.

As to merger of foreign limited liability company, see §

13.1-1060

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 58 substituted “§

50-73.83

” for “§

50-73.85

” in subsection E.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 567 rewrote subsection A, which formerly read: “After a merger, the surviving partnership or limited partnership may file a statement that one or more partnerships or limited partnerships have merged into the surviving entity; but if a partnership or limited partnership that is a party to the merger has, before the effective date of the merger, filed a statement or certificate with the Commission under this title, a statement of merger shall be filed”; inserted “executed by each party to the merger” in the introductory language of subsection B; added present subdivision B 3; and redesignated former subdivisions B 3 and B 4 as subdivisions B 4 and B 5.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 substituted “principal office” for “chief executive office” in subdivision B 4.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 rewrote subsection A, which formerly read: “After a merger, the surviving partnership or limited partnership shall file with the Commission a statement of merger on behalf of the partnerships that have filed statements of partnership authority that have not been canceled.”